Utah statutes.
53A-15-303.   School district responsibility -- Reimbursement of costs -- Other programs.

(1) (a)  Each school district shall provide, either singly or in cooperation with other school districts or public institutions, a free, appropriate education program for all students with disabilities who are residents of the district.

(b)  The program shall include necessary special facilities, instruction, and education-related services.

(c)  The costs of a district's program, or a district's share of a joint program, shall be paid from district funds.

(2)  School districts that provide special education services under this chapter in accordance with applicable rules of the State Board of Education shall receive reimbursement from the board under Title 53A, Chapter 17a, Minimum School Program Act, and other applicable laws.

(3) (a)  A school district may, singly or in cooperation with other public entities, provide education and training for persons with disabilities who are younger than three or older than 22 consistent with Subsection 53A-15-301(1).

(b)  The cost of such a program may be paid from fees, contributions, and other funds received by the district for support of the program, but may not be paid from public education funds.



Amended by Chapter 82, 2002 General Session

